Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4214
Plan of operation, defined.

Plan of operation means the plan of operation of the pool, including articles, bylaws, and operating rules, submitted by the board pursuant to section 44-4218.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 14;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 18.